en: Report Covers
xx: Report Covers
cs: Desky s fólií
da: Omslag til rapporter
de: Klemmhefter
es: Dossier
fr: Couvertures pour rapports
it: Proteggidocumenti
ja: レポートカバー
nl: Snelhechters
no: Rapportomslag
pl: Skoroszyty
pt: Pastas para relatórios
ru: Папки файловые
sv: Klämmappar
tr: Poşet Dosyalar

en: Greeting Card Organizers
xx: Greeting Card Organizers
cs: Organizéry na blahopřání
da: Lykønskningskortholdere
de: Postkartenorganizer
es: Organizadores de tarjetas de felicitación
fr: Systèmes de rangement pour cartes de vœux
it: Organizer biglietti auguri
ja: グリーティングカードホルダー
nl: Organizers voor wenskaarten
no: Gratulasjonskort-ordnere
pl: Organizery na kartki okolicznościowe
pt: Organizadores de cartões comemorativos
ru: Органайзеры для поздравительных открыток
sv: Organisering av gratulationskort
tr: Tebrik Kartı Düzenleyicileri

en: Mail Sorters
xx: Mail Sorters
cs: Třídiče pošty
da: Postsortering
de: Postsortiersysteme
es: Clasificadoras de correo
fr: Trieurs de courrier
it: Organizzatori per posta
ja: 郵便分類ケース
nl: Postsorteerbakjes
no: Posthyller
pl: Sortery przesyłek pocztowych
pt: Organizadores de cartas
ru: Устройства для сортировки почты
sv: Brevsorterare
tr: Posta Tasnif Rafları

en: Pen & Pencil Cases
xx: Pen & Pencil Cases
cs: Penály a obaly na pera
da: Blyantsholdere
de: Federmappen
es: Estuches
fr: Étuis à crayons et stylos
it: Portapenne e portamatite
ja: 筆箱・ペンケース
nl: Pennen- en potloodhouders
no: Pennaler
pl: Pojemniki na przybory piśmiennicze i rysunkowe
pt: Estojos de caneta e lápis
ru: Футляры для ручек и карандашей
sv: Pennskrin
tr: Kalem Kutuları

en: Portfolios & Padfolios
xx: Portfolios & Padfolios
cs: Aktovky a desky na papíry
da: Præsentationsmapper
de: Akten- & Schreibmappen
es: Portafolios
fr: Conférenciers
it: Portafogli
ja: 書類ケース・ノートパッド付きファイル
nl: Port- en padfolio's
no: Mapper
pl: Organizery typu portfolio i padfolio
pt: Pastas de convenção
ru: Портфолио
sv: Dokumentportföljer och skrivportföljer
tr: Portfolyo Dosyaları ve Bloknotlu Dosyalar

en: Padfolios
xx: Padfolios
cs: Desky
da: Dokumentomslag
de: Schreibmappen
es: Carpetas portadocumentos
fr: Padfolios
it: Copertine per documenti
ja: ノートパッド付きファイル
nl: Padfolio's
no: Dokumentmappe
pl: Teczki konferencyjne
pt: Pastas para portfólio
ru: Органайзеры
sv: Konferensmappar
tr: Kalemli Not Defterleri

en: Portfolios
xx: Portfolios
cs: Portfolia
da: Mapper
de: Aktenmappen
es: Carteras portadocumentos
fr: Portfolios
it: Cartelle portadocumenti
ja: 書類ケース
nl: Portfolio's
no: Dokumentveske
pl: Albumy ofertowe
pt: Portfólios
ru: Папки
sv: Dokumentmappar
tr: Evrak Cüzdanları

en: Recipe Card Boxes
xx: Recipe Card Boxes
cs: Pořadače na recepty
da: Opskriftskortkasser
de: Rezeptkästen
es: Archivadores de recetas
fr: Boîtes à recettes de cuisine
it: Scatole per ricette
ja: レシピカード収納ケース
nl: Receptkaartendozen
no: Esker til oppskriftskort
pl: Pudełka na karty z przepisami
pt: Caixas de receitas
ru: Коробки для карточек с рецептами
sv: Receptkortlådor
tr: Yemek Tarif Kartı Kutuları

en: General Office Supplies
xx: General Office Supplies
cs: Obecné kancelářské potřeby
da: Generelle forbrugsvarer
de: Schreibwaren
es: Productos generales
fr: Fournitures de bureau générales
it: Forniture generiche per ufficio
ja: 事務用消耗品
nl: Algemene kantoorbenodigdheden
no: Generelle rekvisita
pl: Artykuły różne
pt: Suprimentos em geral
ru: Общие принадлежности
sv: Allmänt kontorsmaterial
tr: Genel Ofis Malzemeleri

en: Brass Fasteners
xx: Brass Fasteners
cs: Mosazné sponky
da: Prøveposelukkere
de: Musterklammern
es: Pasadores de latón
fr: Attaches parisiennes
it: Fissaggi in ottone
ja: 割りピン
nl: Koperen splitpennen en papierbinders
no: Messingklips
pl: Pinezki z łbem metalowym
pt: Fixadores de bronze
ru: Зажимы для бумаги
sv: Påsnitar
tr: Pirinç Kağıt Tutturucular

en: Correction Fluids\, Pens & Tapes
xx: Correction Fluids\, Pens & Tapes
cs: Opravné laky\, pera a pásky
da: Rettelak\, penne og tape
de: Korrekturflüssigkeiten\, Korrekturstifte & Korrekturbänder
es: Corrector líquido\, en lápiz y cinta
fr: Liquides\, stylos et rubans correcteurs
it: Fluidi correttori\, penne e nastri
ja: 修正液・修正テープ
nl: Correctievloeistof\, -pennen en -plakband
no: Korrekturlakk\, -penner og -bånd
pl: Korektory
pt: Líquidos\, canetas e fitas corretivas
ru: Корректирующие жидкости\, ручки и ленты
sv: Korrekturlack\, pennor och tejp
tr: Daksiller\, Kalem Silgiler ve Şerit Silgiler

en: Correction Fluids
xx: Correction Fluids
cs: Korekční kapaliny
da: Rettelak
de: Korrekturflüssigkeiten
es: Correctores líquidos
fr: Correcteurs liquides
it: Correttori liquidi
ja: 修正液
nl: Correctievloeistoffen
no: Korrekturlakk
pl: Korektory w płynie
pt: Corretivo líquido
ru: Корректирующие жидкости
sv: Korrigeringsvätskor
tr: Sıvı Düzelticiler

en: Correction Pens
xx: Correction Pens
cs: Bělítka
da: Rettepenne
de: Korrekturstifte
es: Bolígrafos correctores
fr: Stylos correcteurs
it: Correttori a penna
ja: 修正ペン
nl: Correctiepennen
no: Rettepenner
pl: Korektory w pisaku
pt: Corretivo em caneta
ru: Корректирующие ручки
sv: Korrigeringspennor
tr: Kalem Şerit Düzelticiler

en: Correction Tapes
xx: Correction Tapes
cs: Korekční pásky
da: Rettetape
de: Korrekturbänder
es: Correctores en cinta
fr: Rubans correcteurs
it: Correttori a nastro
ja: 修正テープ
nl: Correctierollers
no: Retteteip
pl: Korektory w taśmie
pt: Corretivo em fita
ru: Корректирующие ленты
sv: Korrigeringstejp
tr: Şerit Düzelticiler

en: Erasers
xx: Erasers
cs: Gumy
da: Viskelædere
de: Radiergummis
es: Gomas de borrar
fr: Gommes
it: Gomme
ja: 消しゴム
nl: Gummen
no: Viskelær
pl: Gumki do mazania
pt: Borrachas
ru: Ластики
sv: Radergummin
tr: Silgiler

en: Labels & Tags
xx: Labels & Tags
cs: Štítky a značky
da: Etiketter og mærkater
de: Etiketten & Anhängerschilder
es: Etiquetas y etiquetas adhesivas
fr: Étiquettes et vignettes
it: Etichette e schede
ja: ラベル・タグ
nl: Labels en etiketten
no: Merker og etiketter
pl: Etykiety i przekładki indeksujące
pt: Etiquetas e adesivos
ru: Ярлыки и этикетки
sv: Etiketter
tr: Etiketler ve Fişler

en: Address Labels
xx: Address Labels
cs: Adresní štítky
da: Adresseetiketter
de: Adressaufkleber
es: Etiquetas de dirección
fr: Étiquettes pour adresses
it: Etichette indirizzo
ja: 宛名ラベル
nl: Adreslabels
no: Adresseetiketter
pl: Etykiety adresowe
pt: Etiquetas para endereçamento
ru: Адресные бирки
sv: Adressetiketter
tr: Adres Etiketleri

en: Folder Tabs
xx: Folder Tabs
cs: Karty do složek
da: Faneblade
de: Trennblätter
es: Carpetas con pestañas
fr: Onglets
it: Schede per cartellette
ja: フォルダーラベル
nl: Ruiters
no: Mappeark
pl: Przekładki indeksujące
pt: Guias para pastas
ru: Ярлыки для папок
sv: Mappflikar
tr: Klasör İndeks Etiketleri

en: Label Clips
xx: Label Clips
cs: Svorky se štítky
da: Holdere til etiketter
de: Label Clips
es: Clips para etiquetas
fr: Porte-étiquettes
it: Clip adesive
ja: ラベルクリップ
nl: Labelclips
no: Etikettklips
pl: Ramki do etykiet
pt: Etiquetas com clipes
ru: Зажимы с ярлыками
sv: Pappersklämmor med etiketter
tr: Etiketli Kıskaçlar

en: Label Tapes & Refill Rolls
xx: Label Tapes & Refill Rolls
cs: Pásky do štítkovačů
da: Tape til labelmaskiner
de: Klebebänder für Etikettiergeräte
es: Cinta para etiquetar
fr: Rubans d'étiquettes et rouleaux de rechange
it: Nastro e bobine di ricambio per etichette
ja: ラベル用テープ・リフィル
nl: Labeltape en reserverollen
no: Teip og ruller til etikettmaskiner
pl: Taśmy do etykietowania
pt: Etiquetas e rolos de recarga
ru: Этикеточная лента и сменные рулоны
sv: Tejp för präglingsapparater
tr: Etiket Yapma Bantları ve Yedek Ruloları